Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2304
Witness; subpoena; process; fees; payment by county.

In any civil or criminal case in which a party is permitted to proceed in forma pauperis, the court may order witnesses to be subpoenaed if the court finds that they have evidence material and necessary to the case and that they are within the judicial district in which the court is held or within one hundred miles of the place of trial. In such case the process and the fees of the witnesses shall be paid by the county in the same manner as other claims are paid.

Laws 1972, LB 1120, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 689, § 7.